fr: Mode d’application de l’encre du tampon: Tampon à bout pinceau; Tampon applicateur; Tampon en forme de goutte; Doigtier applicateur; Cube d’encre; Tampon à bille; Tampon traditionnel en feutre/mousse; Autre
tr: Mürekkep pedi uygulama yöntemi: Fırça uçlu ped; Sünger uçlu ped; Çiğ damlası (gözyaşı) pedi; Parmak pedi; Mürekkep küpü; Roll-on ped; Geleneksel keçe/köpük pedi; Diğer
th: วิธีการใช้งานแผ่นหมึก: แผ่นหมึกหัวแปรง; แผ่นหมึกหัวฟองน้ำแต้ม; แผ่นหมึกทรงหยดน้ำ; แผ่นหมึกสวมนิ้ว; หมึกทรงลูกบาศก์; แผ่นหมึกแบบลูกกลิ้ง; แผ่นหมึกสักหลาด/โฟมแบบดั้งเดิม; อื่นๆ
cs: Metoda aplikace inkoustového polštářku: Poduška se štětcem; Poduška s houbičkou; Poduška ve tvaru kapky; Prstová poduška; Inkoustová kostka; Rolovací poduška; Tradiční plstěná/pěnová poduška; Jiné
bg-BG: Метод на приложение на мастиления тампон: Тампон с връх на четка; Тампон с апликатор гъба; Тампон тип капка (сълза); Тампон за пръсти; Мастилено кубче; Рол-он тампон; Традиционен тампон от филц/пяна; Други
nl: Inktkussen toepassingsmethode: Penseelpuntkussen; Depper-kussen; Druppelvormig kussen; Vingerkussen; Inktblokje; Rol-inktkussen; Traditioneel vilt-/schuimkussen; Overige
pt-BR: Carimbeira método de aplicação: Almofada com ponta de pincel; Almofada com aplicador em esponja; Almofada em formato de gota; Almofada para dedos; Cubo de tinta; Almofada roll-on; Almofada tradicional de feltro/espuma; Outro
hu: Tintapárnás alkalmazási mód: Ecsetes párna; Szivacsfejes párna; Csepp alakú párna; Ujjnyomdapárna; Tindakocka; Görgős párna; Hagyományos filc-/szivacspárna; Egyéb
da: Påføringsmetode for stempelpude: Stempelpude med penselspids; Stempelpude med svampespids; Stempelpude (dråbeformet); Fingerpude; Blækterning; Roll-on-stempelpude; Traditionel stempelpude af filt/skum; Andet
zh-TW: 印台使用方式: 刷頭印台; 海綿頭印台; 露滴 (水滴) 印台; 手指印台; 墨水塊; 滾珠印台; 傳統毛氈/泡棉印台; 其他
lt-LT: Rašalo pagalvėlės naudojimo metodas: Pagalvėlė su teptuku; Pagalvėlė su kempinėle; Lašo formos pagalvėlė; Pagalvėlė pirštui; Rašalo kubelis; Ruloninė pagalvėlė; Tradicinė veltinio / porolono pagalvėlė; Kita
es: Método de aplicación de almohadilla de tinta: Almohadilla con punta de pincel; Almohadilla con aplicador de esponja; Almohadilla en forma de lágrima (gota de rocío); Almohadilla para dedos; Cubo de tinta; Almohadilla roll-on; Almohadilla tradicional de fieltro/espuma; Otro
de: Auftragsmethode des Stempelkissens: Stempelkissen mit Pinselspitze; Stempelkissen mit Tupfer; Dew-Drop-Stempelkissen (tropfenförmig); Finger-Stempelkissen; Tintenwürfel; Roll-on-Stempelkissen; Klassisches Filz-/Schaumstoff-Stempelkissen; Sonstige
ko: 잉크 패드 도포 방식: 브러시 팁 패드; 도버 탑 패드; 듀 드롭(물방울) 패드; 핑거 패드; 잉크 큐브; 롤온 패드; 전통 펠트/폼 패드; 기타
ja: インクパッドアプリの使い方: ブラシチップパッド; ドーバートップパッド; デュードロップ (ティアドロップ) パッド; フィンガーパッド; インクキューブ; ロールオンパッド; 従来のフェルト/フォームパッド; その他
fi: Mustetyynyn käyttömenetelmä: Sivellinkärkinen tyyny; Töpötinkärkinen tyyny; Pisaranmuotoinen tyyny; Sormityyny; Mustekuutio; Roll-on-tyyny; Perinteinen huopa-/vaahtomuovityyny; Muu
zh-CN: 印台使用方式: 刷头印台; 涂抹头印台; 水滴形印台; 手指印台; 墨块; 滚轮印台; 传统毛毡/海绵印台; 其他
it: Metodo di applicazione del tampone d'inchiostro: Cuscinetto con punta a pennello; Cuscinetto con applicatore in spugna; Cuscinetto a goccia; Cuscinetto da dito; Cubo di inchiostro; Cuscinetto roll-on; Cuscinetto tradizionale in feltro/schiuma; Altro
sl-SI: Način uporabe blazinice za štampiljke: Blazinica s konico čopiča; Blazinica z aplikatorjem (Dauber); Blazinica v obliki solze (Dew drop); Blazinica za prst; Kockasta blazinica; Rolon blazinica; Tradicionalna blazinica iz klobučevine/pene; Drugo
hr-HR: Metoda nanošenja tinte jastučićem: Jastučić u obliku kista; Jastučić u obliku spužvice (dauber); Jastučić u obliku kapi (suze); Jastučić za prste; Kockica s tintom; Roll-on jastučić; Tradicionalni jastučić od filca/pjene; Ostalo
pt-PT: Método da aplicação de almofada de tinta: Almofada com ponta de pincel; Almofada com aplicador de esponja; Almofada em gota (lágrima); Almofada de dedo; Cubo de tinta; Almofada roll-on; Almofada de feltro/espuma tradicional; Outro
ro-RO: Metoda de aplicare a tamponului de cerneală: Tușieră cu vârf tip pensulă; Tușieră cu aplicator din burete; Tușieră tip lacrimă (dew drop); Tușieră pentru degete; Cub de tuș; Tușieră cu aplicator roll-on; Tușieră tradițională din pâslă/spumă; Altele
sv: Appliceringsmetod för stämpeldyna: Dyna med penselspets; Dyna med svamptopp; Droppformad dyna (dew drop); Fingerdyna; Bläckkub; Roll-on-dyna; Traditionell filt-/skumdyna; Övrigt
en: Ink pad application method: Brush-tip pad; Dauber-top pad; Dew drop (teardrop) pad; Finger pad; Ink cube; Roll-on pad; Traditional felt/foam pad; Other
el: Μέθοδος εφαρμογής ταμπόν μελανιού: Ταμπόν με άκρο πινέλου; Ταμπόν με σφουγγαράκι (dauber); Ταμπόν σε σχήμα σταγόνας; Ταμπόν δαχτύλου; Κύβος μελάνης; Ταμπόν roll-on; Παραδοσιακό ταμπόν από τσόχα/αφρό; Άλλο
ru: Способ нанесения чернил штемпельной подушкой: Подушечка с наконечником-кистью; Подушечка с аппликатором; Подушечка «капля»; Пальчиковая подушечка; Чернильный кубик; Роликовая подушечка; Традиционная фетровая/поролоновая подушечка; Другое
vi: Phương pháp sử dụng mực từ miếng đệm: Đệm mực đầu cọ; Đệm mực đầu chấm; Đệm mực giọt nước; Đệm ngón tay; Khối mực; Đệm lăn mực; Đệm mút/nỉ truyền thống; Khác
nb: Metode for påføring av blekkpute: Pute med penseltupp; Pute med svamptupp; Dråpeformet pute; Fingerpute; Blekkterning; Roll-on-pute; Tradisjonell filt-/skumpute; Annet
sk-SK: Spôsob aplikácia atramentového vankúšika: Poduška s koncovkou štetca; Poduška s penovým aplikátorom; Kvapôčková poduška; Prstová poduška; Atramentová kocka; Guľôčková poduška; Tradičná plstená/penová poduška; Iné
pl: Metoda aplikacji poduszki tuszującej: Poduszka z pędzelkiem; Poduszka z aplikatorem; Poduszka w kształcie kropli; Poduszka na palec; Kostka z tuszem; Poduszka w rolce; Tradycyjna poduszka filcowa/piankowa; Inne